Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.761, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Psychological testing and assessment rates. new text end new text begin (a) Effective for services rendered on or after January 1, 2027, or on or after the date of federal approval, whichever is later, the commissioner must pay 100 percent of the total published Medicare payment rate, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 438.6, for the following services: new text end new text begin (1) neuropsychological assessments under section 256B.0671, subdivision 8; new text end new text begin (2) neuropsychological testing under section 256B.0671, subdivision 9; and new text end new text begin (3) psychological testing under section 256B.0671, subdivision 10. new text end new text begin (b) Managed care and county-based purchasing plans must reimburse providers at an amount that is at least equal to the fee-for-service rate for services under this subdivision. The commissioner must monitor the effect of this rate adjustment on enrollee access to mental health services. If for any contract year federal approval is not received for this paragraph, the commissioner must adjust the capitation rates paid to managed care and county-based purchasing plans for that contract year to reflect the removal of this paragraph. Contracts between managed care and county-based purchasing plans and providers to whom this paragraph applies must allow recovery of payments from those providers if capitation rates are adjusted in accordance with this paragraph. Payment recoveries must not exceed the amount equal to any increase in rates that results from this paragraph. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision expires on the effective date of Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 8, section 29. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 38, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-07924 256B.0625 COVERED SERVICES. Subd. 38. Payments for mental health services. Payments for mental health services covered under the medical assistance program that are provided by masters-prepared mental health professionals shall be 80 percent of the rate paid to doctoral-prepared professionals. Payments for mental health services covered under the medical assistance program that are provided by masters-prepared mental health professionals employed by community mental health centers shall be 100 percent of the rate paid to doctoral-prepared professionals. Payments for mental health services covered under the medical assistance program that are provided by physician assistants shall be 80.4 percent of the base rate paid to psychiatrists.